test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ang_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ang: # Noun 92 'eng /est hang ­u/fin' - full paradigm
     ang+N+Sg+Nom: ang
     ang+N+Sg+Gen: ang
     ang+N+Sg+Par: angõ
     ang+N+Sg+Dat: angõn
     ang+N+Sg+Ins: angkõks
     ang+N+Sg+Ill: angõ
     ang+N+Sg+Ela: angstõ
     ang+N+Pl+Nom: āngõd
     ang+N+Pl+Gen: āngõd
     ang+N+Pl+Par: angḑi
     ang+N+Pl+Dat: āngõdõn
     ang+N+Pl+Ins: āngõdõks
     ang+N+Pl+Ill: āngiž
     ang+N+Pl+Ela: āngist
